Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Regulation of Charitable Solicitations
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

§79-11-526.
Sponsors and advertisers of events liable only when having control or supervision of events.

For purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Sponsor” or “advertiser” means any person, corporation or legal entity who, for charitable purposes or for the promotion of the health, peace and welfare of the community, donates or contributes products, material, money or pays fees for advertising or displaying trademarks in order that an event may be held or conducted.

“Event” means a concert, benefit, fundraiser, auction or other occasion at which entertainment, food or beverages are provided.

A sponsor or advertiser of an event shall not be held vicariously liable for the negligence of another in connection with or as a consequence of his involvement as a sponsor or advertiser of an event if he does not exercise any control or supervision over any aspect of the event.

This section shall not confer immunity on a sponsor or advertiser of an event for willful acts or gross negligence, and a sponsor or advertiser of an event shall not be considered to be a part of a joint venture or the principal of an agent, with regard to any other person, corporation or legal entity which is participating in the event in a capacity other than that of a sponsor or advertiser.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 448, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2003.).

§79-11-527.
Reciprocal agreements with other states; public access to registration records.

The Secretary of State may enter into reciprocal agreements with a like authority of any other state or states for the purpose of exchanging information made available to the Secretary of State or to such other like authority.

The information contained in or filed with any registration application, renewal or report may be made available to the public under such rules as the Secretary of State prescribes. Information in the possession of, filed with or obtained by the Secretary of State in connection with any investigation or examination under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 shall be confidential and exempt from the requirements of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. No such information may be disclosed by the Secretary of State or any of his officers or employees unless necessary or appropriate in connection with a particular investigation or proceeding under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 or for any law enforcement purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 14; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

Mississippi Public Records Act, see
§ 25-61-1 et seq.

§79-11-529.
Fines and penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willingly violates the provisions of Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-527 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year or both. In connection with any solicitation, any person employing a device, scheme or artifice to defraud; or engaging in any act, practice or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person, or obtaining money or property by means of any false pretense, representation or promise shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or both. No indictment or information may be returned under Sections 79-11-501 through 79-11-529 more than five (5) years after the alleged violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 515, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1992, ch. 446, § 15; Laws, 1997, ch. 444, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 1992. Subsequently,
Laws of 1992, ch. 446, § 16, amended
Laws of 1991, ch. 515, § 16, deleting the repeal provision.

Imposition of standard state assessment in addition to all court imposed fines or other penalties for any misdemeanor violation, see § 99-19-73.

A violation of Section 79-11-529 could be processed and prosecuted by a municipality as a violation of a municipal ordinance, pursuant to Section 21-13-19, to be heard by the municipal judge under the authority provided in Section 21-23-7. Dye, Oct. 13, 2006, A.G. Op. 06-0474.

Criminal offenses under statutes and ordinances regulating charitable solicitations. 76 A.L.R.3d 924.